Utah statutes.
26A-1-111.   Removal of local health officer.
(1)  The local health officer may be removed for cause in accordance with this
section by:
(a)  the board; or
(b)  a majority of the counties in the local health department if the county
executives rescind, or withdraw, in writing the ratification of the local
health officer.
(2) (a)  A hearing shall be granted, if requested by the local health officer,
prior to removal of the local health officer.
(b)  If a hearing is requested, it shall be conducted by a five-member panel
with:
(i)  two elected members from the county or counties in the local health
department, selected by the county executives;
(ii)  two members of the board of the local health department who are not
elected officials of the counties in the local health department, selected by
the board; and
(iii)  one member selected by the members appointed under Subsections
(2)(b)(i) and (ii), however, the member appointed under this Subsection (iii)
may not be an elected official of the counties in the local health department
and may not be a member of the board of the local health department.
(c) (i)  The hearing panel shall report its decision regarding termination to
the board and to the counties in the local health department.
(ii)  The counties and board receiving the report shall vote on whether to
retain or terminate the local health officer.
(iii)  The health officer is terminated if:
(A)  the board votes to terminate; or
(B)  a majority of the counties in the local health department vote to
terminate.
